California statutes. Probate Code
(a) The trustee or any transferee may commence a proceeding to have a court determine the proration pursuant to this chapter.

(b) A proceeding under this article shall be commenced in the court in which the estate of the decedent was administered or, if no administration proceedings have been commenced, in the superior court of any county in which the estate of the decedent may be administered.

(c) If proceedings for the administration of the decedent’s estate are pending, a proceeding under this article shall be combined with the administration proceedings. If a proceeding is commenced at any time before final distribution, there shall be no additional filing fee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20221.

A proceeding under this article shall be commenced by filing a petition that sets forth all of the following information:

(a) The jurisdictional facts.

(b) Other facts necessary for the court to determine the proration of the generation-skipping transfer tax.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20222.

Not less than 30 days before the hearing the petitioner shall do both of the following:

(a) Cause notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the trustee and each transferee against whom prorated amounts may be charged pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 20223.

(b) Cause a summons and a copy of the petition to be served on each transferee who may be directed to make payment of prorated amounts pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 20223. The summons shall be in the form and shall be served in the manner prescribed in
 Title 5 (commencing with Section 410.10) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 107.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

20223.

(a) The court, upon making a determination as provided in this article, shall make an order:

(1) Directing the trustee to charge the prorated amounts against the transferees against whom the generation-skipping transfer tax has been prorated insofar as the trustee is in possession of any property or interests of the transferees against whom the charge may be made.

(2) Summarily directing all other transferees against whom the generation-skipping transfer tax has been prorated to make payment of the prorated amounts to the trustee.

(b) A court order made under this section is a judgment that may be enforced against the persons against whom a generation-skipping transfer tax has been prorated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

20224.

Upon petition by the trustee or any transferee, the court shall modify an order made pursuant to this article whenever it appears that the amount of generation-skipping transfer tax as actually determined is different from the amount of tax on which the court based the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20225.

(a) A trustee acting or resident in another state may commence an action in this state to recover from a transferee, who either is resident in this state or owns property in this state, the amount of the federal generation-skipping transfer tax, or a generation-skipping transfer tax payable to another state, apportioned to the person.

(b) The action shall be commenced in the superior court of any county in which administration of the estate of the decedent would be proper or, if none, in which any defendant resides.

(c) For purposes of the action an apportionment by the court having jurisdiction of the administration of the decedent’s estate in the other state is prima facie correct.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11. CONSTRUCTION OF WILLS, TRUSTS, AND OTHER INSTRUMENTS [21101. - 21700.]



PART 1. RULES FOR INTERPRETATION OF INSTRUMENTS [21101. - 21140.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [21101. - 21118.]

21101.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, this part applies to a will, trust, deed, and any other instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21102.

(a) The intention of the transferor as expressed in the instrument controls the legal effect of the dispositions made in the instrument.

(b) The rules of construction in this part apply where the intention of the transferor is not indicated by the instrument.

(c) Nothing in this section limits the use of extrinsic evidence, to the extent otherwise authorized by law, to determine the intention of the transferor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21103.

The meaning and legal effect of a disposition in an instrument is determined by the local law of a particular state selected by the transferor in the instrument unless the application of that law is contrary to the rights of the surviving spouse to community and quasi-community property, to any other public policy of this state applicable to the disposition, or, in the case of a will, to Part 3 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21104.

As used in this part, “at-death transfer” means a transfer that is revocable during the lifetime of the transferor, but does not include a joint tenancy or joint account with right of survivorship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21105.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 641 and 642, a will passes all property the testator owns at death, including property acquired after execution of the will.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21107.

If an instrument directs the conversion of real property into money at the transferor’s death, the real property and its proceeds shall be deemed personal property from the time of the transferor’s death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21108.

The law of this state does not include (a) the common law rule of worthier title that a transferor cannot devise an interest to his or her own heirs or (b) a presumption or rule of interpretation that a transferor does not intend, by a transfer to his or her own heirs or next of kin, to transfer an interest to them. The meaning of a transfer of a legal or equitable interest to a transferor’s own heirs or next of kin, however designated, shall be determined by the general rules applicable to the interpretation of instruments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21109.

(a) A transferee who fails to survive the transferor of an at-death transfer or until any future time required by the instrument does not take under the instrument.

(b) If it cannot be determined by clear and convincing evidence that the transferee survived until a future time required by the instrument, it is deemed that the transferee did not survive until the required future time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21110.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), if a transferee is dead when the instrument is executed, or fails or is treated as failing to survive the transferor or until a future time required by the instrument, the issue of the deceased transferee take in the transferee’s place in the manner provided in Section 240. A transferee under a class gift shall be a transferee for the purpose of this subdivision unless the transferee’s death occurred before the execution of the instrument and that fact was known to the transferor when the instrument was executed.

(b) The issue of a deceased transferee do not take in the transferee’s place if the instrument expresses a contrary intention or a substitute disposition. A requirement that the
 initial transferee survive the transferor or survive for a specified period of time after the death of the transferor constitutes a contrary intention. A requirement that the initial transferee survive until a future time that is related to the probate of the transferor’s will or administration of the estate of the transferor constitutes a contrary intention.

(c) As used in this section, “transferee” means a person who is kindred of the transferor or kindred of a surviving, deceased, or former spouse of the transferor, but does not mean a spouse of the transferor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 71, Sec. 1.   (AB 1960)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21111.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) and subject to Section 21110, if a transfer fails for any reason, the property is transferred as follows:

(1) If the transferring instrument provides for an alternative disposition in the event the transfer fails, the property is transferred according to the terms of the instrument.

(2) If the transferring instrument does not provide for an alternative disposition but does provide for the transfer of a residue, the property becomes a part of the residue transferred under the instrument.

(3) If the transferring instrument does not provide for an alternative disposition and does not provide for the transfer of a residue, or if the transfer is itself a residuary gift, the property is transferred to the decedent’s estate.

(b) Subject to Section 21110, if a residuary gift or a future interest is transferred to two or more persons and the share of a transferee fails for any reason, and no alternative disposition is provided, the share passes to the other transferees in proportion to their other interest in the residuary gift or the future interest.

(c) A transfer of “all my estate” or words of similar import is a residuary gift for purposes of this section.

(d) If failure of a future interest results in an intestacy, the property passes to the heirs of the transferor determined pursuant to Section 21114.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21112.

A condition in a transfer of a present or future interest that refers to a person’s death “with” or “without” issue, or to a person’s “having” or “leaving” issue or no issue, or a condition based on words of similar import, is construed to refer to that person’s being dead at the time the transfer takes effect in enjoyment and to that person either having or not having, as the case may be, issue who are alive at the time of enjoyment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21114.

(a) If a statute or an instrument provides for transfer of a present or future interest to, or creates a present or future interest in, a designated person’s “heirs,” “heirs at law,” “next of kin,” “relatives,” or “family,” or words of similar import, the transfer is to the persons, including the state under Section 6800, and in the shares that would succeed to the designated person’s intestate estate under the intestate succession law of the transferor’s domicile, if the designated person died when the transfer is to take effect in enjoyment. If the designated person’s surviving spouse is living but is remarried at the time the transfer is to take effect in enjoyment, the surviving spouse is not an heir of the designated person for purposes of this section.

(b) As used in this section, “designated person” includes the transferor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21115.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), halfbloods, adopted persons, persons born out of wedlock, stepchildren, foster children, and the issue of these persons when appropriate to the class, are included in terms of class gift or relationship in accordance with the rules for determining relationship and inheritance rights for purposes of intestate succession.

(b) In construing a transfer by a transferor who is not the natural parent, a person born to the natural parent shall not be considered the child of that parent unless the person lived while a minor as a regular member of the household of the natural parent or of that parent’s parent, brother, sister, spouse, or surviving spouse. In construing a transfer by a transferor who is not the adoptive parent, a person adopted by the adoptive parent shall not be considered the child of that parent unless the person lived while a minor (either before or after the adoption) as a regular member of the household of the adopting parent or of that parent’s parent, brother, sister, or surviving spouse.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall also apply in determining:

(1) Persons who would be kindred of the transferor or kindred of a surviving, deceased, or former spouse of the transferor under Section 21110.

(2) Persons to be included as issue of a deceased transferee under Section 21110.

(3) Persons who would be the transferor’s or other designated person’s heirs under Section 21114.

(d) The rules for determining intestate succession under this section are those in effect at the time the transfer is to take effect in enjoyment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21117.

At-death transfers are classified as follows:

(a) A specific gift is a transfer of specifically identifiable property.

(b) A general gift is a transfer from the general assets of the transferor that does not give specific property.

(c) A demonstrative gift is a general gift that specifies the fund or property from which the transfer is primarily to be made.

(d) A general pecuniary gift is a pecuniary gift within the meaning of Section 21118.

(e) An annuity is a general pecuniary gift that is payable periodically.

(f) A residuary gift is a transfer of property that remains after all specific and general gifts have been satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21118.

(a) If an instrument authorizes a fiduciary to satisfy a pecuniary gift wholly or partly by distribution of property other than money, property selected for that purpose shall be valued at its fair market value on the date of distribution, unless the instrument expressly provides otherwise. If the instrument permits the fiduciary to value the property selected for distribution as of a date other than the date of distribution, then, unless the instrument expressly provides otherwise, the property selected by the fiduciary for that purpose shall fairly reflect net appreciation and depreciation (occurring between the valuation date and the date of distribution) in all of the assets from which the distribution could have been made.

(b) As used in this section, “pecuniary gift” means a transfer of property made in an instrument that either is expressly stated as a fixed dollar amount or is a dollar amount determinable by the provisions of the instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Ascertaining Meaning of Language Used in the Instrument [21120. - 21122.]

21120.

The words of an instrument are to receive an interpretation that will give every expression some effect, rather than one that will render any of the expressions inoperative. Preference is to be given to an interpretation of an instrument that will prevent intestacy or failure of a transfer, rather than one that will result in an intestacy or failure of a transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21121.

All parts of an instrument are to be construed in relation to each other and so as, if possible, to form a consistent whole. If the meaning of any part of an instrument is ambiguous or doubtful, it may be explained by any reference to or recital of that part in another part of the instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21122.

The words of an instrument are to be given their ordinary and grammatical meaning unless the intention to use them in another sense is clear and their intended meaning can be ascertained. Technical words are not necessary to give effect to a disposition in an instrument. Technical words are to be considered as having been used in their technical sense unless (a) the context clearly indicates a contrary intention or (b) it satisfactorily appears that the instrument was drawn solely by the transferor and that the transferor was unacquainted with the technical sense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Exoneration; Ademption [21131. - 21139.]

21131.

A specific gift passes the property transferred subject to any mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien existing at the date of death, without right of exoneration, regardless of a general directive to pay debts contained in the instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21132.

(a) If a transferor executes an instrument that makes an at-death transfer of securities and the transferor then owned securities that meet the description in the instrument, the transfer includes additional securities owned by the transferor at death to the extent the additional securities were acquired by the transferor after the instrument was executed as a result of the transferor’s ownership of the described securities and are securities of any of the following types:

(1) Securities of the same organization acquired by reason of action initiated by the organization or any successor, related, or acquiring organization, excluding any acquired by exercise of purchase options.

(2) Securities of another organization acquired as a result of a merger, consolidation, reorganization, or other distribution by the organization or any successor, related, or acquiring organization.

(3) Securities of the same organization acquired as a result of a plan of reinvestment.

(b) Distributions in cash before death with respect to a described security are not part of the transfer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21133.

A recipient of an at-death transfer of a specific gift has a right to the property specifically given, to the extent the property is owned by the transferor at the time the gift takes effect in possession or enjoyment, and all of the following:

(a) Any balance of the purchase price (together with any security agreement) owing from a purchaser to the transferor at the time the gift takes effect in possession or enjoyment by reason of sale of the property.

(b) Any amount of an eminent domain award for the taking of the property unpaid at the time the gift takes effect in possession or enjoyment.

(c) Any proceeds unpaid at the time the gift takes effect in possession or enjoyment on fire or casualty insurance on or other recovery for injury to the property.

(d) Property owned by the transferor at the time the gift takes effect in possession or enjoyment and acquired as a result of foreclosure, or obtained in lieu of foreclosure, of the security interest for a specifically given obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21134.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if, after the execution of the instrument of gift, specifically given property is sold, or encumbered by a deed of trust, mortgage, or other instrument, by a conservator, by an agent acting within the authority of a durable power of attorney for an incapacitated principal, or by a trustee acting for an incapacitated settlor of a trust established by the settlor as a revocable trust, the transferee of the specific gift has the right to a general pecuniary gift equal to the net sale price of the property unreduced by the payoff of any such encumbrance, or the amount of the unpaid encumbrance on the property as well as the property itself.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if an eminent domain award for the taking of specifically given property is paid to a conservator, to an agent acting within the authority of a durable power of attorney for an incapacitated principal, or to a trustee acting for an incapacitated settlor of a trust established by the settlor as a revocable trust, or if the proceeds on fire or casualty insurance on, or recovery for injury to, specifically gifted property are paid to a conservator, to an agent acting within the authority of a durable power of attorney for an incapacitated principal, or to a trustee acting for an incapacitated settlor of a trust established by the settlor as a revocable trust, the recipient of the specific gift has the right to a general pecuniary gift equal to the eminent domain award or the insurance proceeds or recovery unreduced by the payoff of any encumbrance placed on the property by the conservator, agent, or trustee, after the execution of the instrument of
 gift.

(c) For the purpose of the references in this section to a conservator, this section does not apply if, after the sale, mortgage, condemnation, fire, or casualty, or recovery, the conservatorship is terminated and the transferor survives the termination by one year.

(d) For the purpose of the references in this section to an agent acting with the authority of a durable power of attorney for an incapacitated principal, or to a trustee acting for an incapacitated settlor of a trust established by the settlor as a revocable trust, (1) “incapacitated principal” or “incapacitated settlor” means a principal or settlor who is an incapacitated person, (2) no adjudication of incapacity before death is necessary, and (3) the acts of an agent within the authority of a durable power of attorney are presumed to be for an incapacitated principal. However, there shall be no presumption of
 a settlor’s incapacity concerning the acts of a trustee.

(e) The right of the transferee of the specific gift under this section shall be reduced by any right the transferee has under Section 21133.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 195, Sec. 1.   (AB 1985)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

21135.

(a) Property given by a transferor during his or her lifetime to a person is treated as a satisfaction of an at-death transfer to that person in whole or in part only if one of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The instrument provides for deduction of the lifetime gift from the at-death transfer.

(2) The transferor declares in a contemporaneous writing that the gift is in satisfaction of the at-death transfer or that its value is to be deducted from the value of the at-death transfer.

(3) The transferee acknowledges in writing that the gift is in satisfaction of the at-death transfer or that its value is to be deducted from the value of the at-death transfer.

(4) The property given is the same property that is the subject of a specific gift to that person.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), for the purpose of partial satisfaction, property given during lifetime is valued as of the time the transferee came into possession or enjoyment of the property or as of the time of death of the transferor, whichever occurs first.

(c) If the value of the gift is expressed in the contemporaneous writing of the transferor, or in an acknowledgment of the transferee made contemporaneously with the gift, that value is conclusive in the division and distribution of the estate.

(d) If the transferee fails to survive the transferor, the gift is treated as a full or partial satisfaction of the gift, as the case may be, in applying Sections 21110 and 21111 unless the transferor’s contemporaneous writing provides otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21139.

The rules stated in Sections 21133 to 21135, inclusive, are not exhaustive, and nothing in those sections is intended to increase the incidence of ademption under the law of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Effective Dates [21140. - 21140.]

21140.

This part applies to all instruments, regardless of when they were executed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. PERPETUITIES [21200. - 21231.]



  CHAPTER 1. Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities [21200. - 21225.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [21200. - 21202.]

21200.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.

This chapter supersedes the common law rule against perpetuities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

21202.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this part applies to nonvested property interests and unexercised powers of appointment regardless of whether they were created before, on, or after January 1, 1992. 

(b) This part does not apply to any property interest or power of appointment the validity of which has been determined in a judicial proceeding or by a settlement among interested persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities [21205. - 21209.]

21205.

A nonvested property interest is invalid unless one of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) When the interest is created, it is certain to vest or terminate no later than 21 years after the death of an individual then alive. 

(b) The interest either vests or terminates within 90 years after its creation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

21206.

A general power of appointment not presently exercisable because of a condition precedent is invalid unless one of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) When the power is created, the condition precedent is certain to be satisfied or become impossible to satisfy no later than 21 years after the death of an individual then alive. 

(b) The condition precedent either is satisfied or becomes impossible to satisfy within 90 years after its creation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

21207.

A nongeneral power of appointment or a general testamentary power of appointment is invalid unless one of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) When the power is created, it is certain to be irrevocably exercised or otherwise to terminate no later than 21 years after the death of an individual then alive. 

(b) The power is irrevocably exercised or otherwise terminates within 90 years after its creation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

21208.

In determining whether a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment is valid under this article, the possibility that a child will be born to an individual after the individual’s death is disregarded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

21209.

(a) If, in measuring a period from the creation of a trust or other property arrangement, language in a governing instrument (1) seeks to disallow the vesting or termination of any interest or trust beyond, (2) seeks to postpone the vesting or termination of any interest or trust until, or (3) seeks to operate in effect in any similar fashion upon, the later of (A) the expiration of a period of time not exceeding 21 years after the death of the survivor of specified lives in being at the creation of the trust or other property arrangement or (B) the expiration of a period of time that exceeds or might exceed 21 years after the death of the survivor of lives in being at the creation of the trust or other property arrangement, that language is inoperative to the extent it produces a period that exceeds 21 years after the death of the survivor of the specified lives. 

(b) Notwithstanding Section 21202, this section applies only to governing instruments, including instruments exercising powers of appointment, executed on or after January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Time of Creation of Interest [21210. - 21212.]

21210.

Except as provided in Sections 21211 and 21212, the time of creation of a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment is determined by other applicable statutes or, if none, under general principles of property law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

21211.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) If there is a person who alone can exercise a power created by a governing instrument to become the unqualified beneficial owner of (1) a nonvested property interest or (2) a property interest subject to a power of appointment described in Section 21206 or 21207, the nonvested property interest or power of appointment is created when the power to become the unqualified beneficial owner terminates. 

(b) A joint power with respect to community property held by individuals married to each other is a power exercisable by one person alone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

21212.

For purposes of this chapter, a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment arising from a transfer of property to a previously funded trust or other existing property arrangement is created when the nonvested property interest or power of appointment in the original contribution was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Reformation [21220. - 21220.]

21220.

On petition of an interested person, a court shall reform a disposition in the manner that most closely approximates the transferor’s manifested plan of distribution and is within the 90 years allowed by the applicable provision in Article 2 (commencing with Section 21205), if any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) A nonvested property interest or a power of appointment becomes invalid under the statutory rule against perpetuities provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 21205).

(b) A class gift is not but might become invalid under the statutory rule against perpetuities provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 21205), and the time has arrived when the share of any class member is to take effect in possession or enjoyment. 

(c) A nonvested property interest that is not validated by subdivision (a) of Section 21205 can vest but not within 90 years after its creation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Exclusions from Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities [21225. - 21225.]

21225.

Article 2 (commencing with Section 21205) does not apply to any of the following:

(a) A nonvested property interest or a power of appointment arising out of a nondonative transfer, except a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment arising out of (1) a premarital or postmarital agreement, (2) a separation or divorce settlement, (3) a spouse’s election, (4) or a similar arrangement arising out of a prospective, existing, or previous marital relationship between the parties, (5) a contract to make or not to revoke a will or trust, (6) a contract to exercise or not to exercise a power of appointment, (7) a transfer in satisfaction of a duty of support, or (8) a reciprocal transfer.

(b) A fiduciary’s power relating to the administration or management of assets, including the power of a fiduciary to sell, lease, or mortgage property, and the power of a fiduciary to determine principal and income.

(c) A power to appoint a fiduciary.

(d) A discretionary power of a trustee to distribute principal before termination of a trust to a beneficiary having an indefeasibly vested interest in the income and principal.

(e) A nonvested property interest held by a charity, government, or governmental agency or subdivision, if the nonvested property interest is preceded by an interest held by another charity, government, or governmental agency or subdivision.

(f) A nonvested property interest in or a power of appointment with respect to a trust or other property arrangement forming part of a pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, health, disability, death benefit, income deferral, or other current or deferred benefit plan for one or more employees, independent contractors, or their beneficiaries or spouses, to which contributions are made for the purpose of distributing to or for the benefit of the participants or their beneficiaries or spouses the property, income, or principal in the trust or other property arrangement, except a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment that is created by an election of a participant or a beneficiary or spouse.

(g) A property interest, power of appointment, or arrangement that was not subject to the common law rule against perpetuities or is excluded by another statute of this state.

(h) A trust created for the purpose of providing for its beneficiaries under hospital service contracts, group life insurance, group disability insurance, group annuities, or any combination of such insurance, as defined in the Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 563, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Related Provisions [21230. - 21231.]

21230.

The lives of individuals selected to govern the time of vesting pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 21205) of Chapter 1 may not be so numerous or so situated that evidence of their deaths is likely to be unreasonably difficult to obtain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

21231.

In determining the validity of a nonvested property interest pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 21205) of Chapter 1, an individual described as the spouse of an individual alive at the commencement of the perpetuities period shall be deemed to be an individual alive when the interest is created, whether or not the individual so described was then alive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. NO CONTEST CLAUSE [21310. - 21315.]

21310.

As used in this part:

(a) “Contest” means a pleading filed with the court by a beneficiary that would result in a penalty under a no contest clause, if the no contest clause is enforced.

(b) “Direct contest” means a contest that alleges the invalidity of a protected instrument or one or more of its terms, based on one or more of the following grounds:

(1) Forgery.

(2) Lack of due execution.

(3) Lack of capacity.

(4) Menace, duress, fraud, or undue influence.

(5) Revocation of a will pursuant to Section 6120, revocation of a trust pursuant to Section 15401, or revocation of an instrument other than a will or trust pursuant to the procedure for revocation that is provided by statute or by the instrument.

(6) Disqualification of a beneficiary under Section 6112, 21350, or 21380.

(c) “No contest clause” means a provision in an otherwise valid instrument that, if enforced, would penalize a beneficiary for filing a pleading in any court.

(d) “Pleading” means a petition, complaint, cross-complaint,
 objection, answer, response, or claim.

(e) “Protected instrument” means all of the following instruments:

(1) The instrument that contains the no contest clause.

(2) An instrument that is in existence on the date that the instrument containing the no contest clause is executed and is expressly identified in the no contest clause, either individually or as part of an identifiable class of instruments, as being governed by the no contest clause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 620, Sec. 5.   (SB 105)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21311.

(a) A no contest clause shall only be enforced against the following types of contests:

(1) A direct contest that is brought without probable cause.

(2) A pleading to challenge a transfer of property on the grounds that it was not the transferor’s property at the time of the transfer. A no contest clause shall only be enforced under this paragraph if the no contest clause expressly provides for that application.

(3) The filing of a creditor’s claim or prosecution of an action based on it. A no contest clause shall only be enforced under this paragraph if the no contest clause expressly provides for that application.

(b) For the purposes of this section, probable cause exists if, at the time of filing a contest, the facts known to the contestant would cause a reasonable person to believe that there is a reasonable likelihood that the requested relief will be granted after an opportunity for further investigation or discovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 174, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative January 1, 2010, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 174.)
-------------------------------------------

21312.

In determining the intent of the transferor, a no contest clause shall be strictly construed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 174, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative January 1, 2010, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 174.)
-------------------------------------------

21313.

This part is not intended as a complete codification of the law governing enforcement of a no contest clause. The common law governs enforcement of a no contest clause to the extent this part does not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 174, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative January 1, 2010, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 174.)
-------------------------------------------

21314.

This part applies notwithstanding a contrary provision in the instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 174, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative January 1, 2010, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 174.)
-------------------------------------------

21315.

(a) This part applies to any instrument, whenever executed, that became irrevocable on or after January 1, 2001.

(b) This part does not apply to an instrument that became irrevocable before January 1, 2001.
